Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1291.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title heading, section 101(a), Chapter 3 heading and sections 303, 307 and 310 of Title 45 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:TITLE 45LEGAL NOTICES AND PUBLIC NOTICES§ 101. Definitions.(a) Definitions applicable to printing or newspaper advertising laws.--Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to <--<--12345678910111213141516171819 specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in:(1) this title; or(2) any other law relating to printing or newspaper advertising;shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Advertisement." A [printed] legal notice or public notice, relating to any matter, authorized by any person, which is published for a valuable consideration in a publication, and which may be required by law, rule, order, or decree of court, or resolution of any corporation, or unincorporated association, or by action of any government unit."Advertiser." Any person who orders and directs a notice or advertisement to be [printed or] published in a publication.["Advertising rule." The line between, or which separates, any two advertisements or notices."Agate." A type 5 1/2 type points in depth or height."Bourgeois." A type 9 type points in depth or height."Brevier." A type 8 type points in depth or height.]"Carrier." A person engaged for hire in the delivery of publications."Circulation." The number of copies printed, issued, sold, or subscribed for, by the day, week, month, or year, at a particular price for each [copy] issue, or for a series of issues over a definite period by any publication, but the term does not include [copies] issues exchanged for other publications or copies or issues circulated gratuitously."Classified advertising." Intelligence or notices, published [and printed in small or inconspicuous type,] as advertising, 20250HB1291PN2880 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 classed with similar notices of advertising, and for which compensation is intended to be charged."Class magazine" or "class newspaper." A [printed] paper or publication containing class, professional, trade, commercial, technical, scientific, educational, religious, financial, legal or other matter and intelligence, intended to be disseminated exclusively among subscribers or readers concerned or interested in the subject matters published.["Column." A single unit or upright section, of the total height of the type printed page, as separated from the remainder of the page by a line, rule, or space, and not less than ten ems pica in width."Column rule." The printed line between, or which separates, the printed columns of any type page.]"Continuous publication." A publication that is accomplished on a regular basis according to the respective requirements established for a digital newspaper, free newspaper, online-only newspaper and printed newspaper. The term shall not be deemed interrupted by any involuntary suspension of publication resulting from the loss, destruction, failure or unavailability of operating facilities, software, hardware, equipment or personnel from whatever cause, and any newspaper so affected shall not be disqualified to publish legal notices and public notices in the event that publication is resumed within one week after it again becomes possible."Court." A court or tribunal of record, established for the public administration of justice under the provisions of the Constitution of Pennsylvania or any statute."Daily newspaper." A newspaper regularly published at least [five] two days in the week[, either including or excluding 20250HB1291PN2880 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sundays and legal holidays]."Decree." A decision, judgment, order or sentence of any court."Digital newspaper." A newspaper delivered in an electronic form on an Internet website that:(1) is formatted similarly to a printed newspaper and produced in an archivable format;(2) maintains an active news gathering in the publication area;(3) is a continuous publication, has been actively publishing for at least six months and is updated at least weekly;(4) has as its primary purpose regularly reporting on matters of importance to the public relating to local and community issues in the publication area;(5) is easily accessible to the public through common Internet search engines or other Internet search means;(6) contains conspicuous links or a heading on its landing page that direct members of the public to legal notices and public notices; and(7) one of the following:(i) distributes, or has ownership interest in, another entity that distributes, newspapers printed in this Commonwealth;(ii) is capable of circulating printed newspapers throughout the publication area; or(iii) is the digital descendant of a printed newspaper product.["Display advertising." Intelligence made conspicuous, and designated by either reading matter, printed from various sizes, 20250HB1291PN2880 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 kinds and styles of types or illustrations, and printed or published for a compensation, demanded or intended to be received from those interested in, affected or served by, the subject matter published."Em." A square of a type, or a space equal to the square of the depth or height of a particular type, as measured by the number of points in height of the type.]"Free newspaper." A printed newspaper:(1) offered gratuitously and principally devoted to the dissemination of ORIGINAL local or general news and other editorial content, which shall not DOES NOT constitute less than 25% 40% of overall content , does not primarily serve as a platform for promoting the interests of a special interest group, individual or cause and follows ethics and standards of print journalism; and AS AN ANNUAL AVERAGE; (2) THAT IS REGISTERED AS A BUSINESS WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE OF THE COMMONWEALTH;(3) THAT EMPLOYS A LOCAL NEWS STAFF;(4) THAT HAS A VERIFIABLE LOCAL AUDIENCE;(5) THAT DOES NOT PRIMARILY SERVE AS A PLATFORM FOR COMMERCIAL ADVERTISING OR PROMOTE THE INTERESTS OF A SPECIAL INTEREST GROUP, INDIVIDUAL OR CAUSE;(6) THAT FOLLOWS ETHICS AND STANDARDS OF PRINTED JOURNALISM; AND(2) (7) THAT is a continuous publication and has been published at not less than weekly intervals in the same community and has been published for at least two years."Issue." A single regular publication of a journal, magazine, daily newspaper, digital newspaper, free newspaper, online-only newspaper, newsletter, printed newspaper or trade 20250HB1291PN2880 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publication."Journal." A newspaper, class newspaper, periodical, or magazine."Law." A statute, a home rule charter, or an enactment entitled an ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation of any government unit."Legal advertisement." A notice, advertisement, publication, statement, or abstract of a notice, advertisement, publication, or statement, required by resolution of a corporation, unincorporated association, or government unit, or ordinance of a political subdivision, or by law, or by rule, order, or decree of court, to be published, for a valuable consideration, in either a newspaper of general circulation, a legal newspaper or an official newspaper."Legal newspaper." A newspaper which is a "legal periodical," "official legal newspaper," or "official legal periodical," publishing legal intelligence, as designated by general rule or rule of court for the publication of legal advertisements and notices required by law, rule, order, or decree of court, to be published in a legal newspaper, legal periodical, official legal newspaper, or official legal periodical, so designated by general rule or rule of court."Legal notice." When required to be printed or published, either a legal advertisement, a legal notice, an official advertisement, or an official legal notice.["Liners." Advertisements, published as reading notices, intelligence, or announcements for which compensation is intended to be charged to those interested in the publication thereof."Long primer." A type 10 type points in depth or height.]20250HB1291PN2880 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Magazine." Partakes of the nature of a periodical.["Minion." A type 7 type points in depth or height.]"News." Narrative, or recent intelligence, disseminating current information as to local, general, or world-wide happenings, concerning any person or persons, matters of private or public interest, or concerning any matters affecting the public welfare.["Newspaper."(1) A printed paper or publication, bearing a title or name, and conveying reading or pictorial intelligence of passing events, local or general happenings, printing regularly or irregularly editorial comment, announcements, miscellaneous reading matter, commercial advertising, classified advertising, legal advertising, and other notices, and which has been issued in numbers of four or more pages at short intervals, either daily, twice or oftener each week, or weekly, continuously during a period of at least six months, or as the successor of such a printed paper or publication issued during an immediate prior period of at least six months, and which has been circulated and distributed from an established place of business to subscribers or readers without regard to number, for a definite price or consideration, either entered or entitled to be entered under the Postal Rules and Regulations as second class matter in the United States mails, and subscribed for by readers at a fixed price for each copy, or at a price fixed per annum. A newspaper may be either a daily newspaper, weekly newspaper, newspaper of general circulation, official newspaper, or a legal newspaper, as defined in this section. Continuous publication within the meaning of this section shall not be 20250HB1291PN2880 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deemed interrupted by any involuntary suspension of publication resulting from loss, destruction, failure or unavailability of operating facilities, equipment or personnel from whatever cause, and any newspaper so affected shall not be disqualified to publish official and legal advertising in the event that publication is resumed within one week after it again becomes possible.(2) A printed paper or publication, regardless of size, contents, or time of issue, or number of copies issued, distributed and circulated gratuitously, is not a newspaper.(3) A printed paper or publication, not entitled to be entered, or which has been denied entry, as second class matter in the United States mails under the Postal Rules and Regulations of the United States is not a newspaper.]"Newspaper of general circulation." As follows:(1) A printed newspaper that:(i) is issued daily, or not less than once a week, intended for general distribution and circulation, and sold at fixed prices per [copy] issue per week, per month, or per annum, to subscribers and readers without regard to business, trade, profession or class[.]; and(ii) has a website and posts all legal notices and public notices published in print on the website and on the Statewide public notice website both at no additional cost.(2) If no printed newspaper that satisfies paragraph (1) exists, a digital newspaper that posts all legal notices and public notices on its website and on the Statewide public notice website at no additional cost.(3) If no newspaper that satisfies either paragraph (1) 20250HB1291PN2880 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or (2) exists, and until such time as one does exist, a free newspaper or an online-only newspaper. A free newspaper must have a website and post all legal notices and public notices thereon and on the Statewide public notice website at no additional cost. An online-only newspaper shall post all legal notices and public notices on the Statewide public notice website at no additional cost. EXISTS: (I) A DIGITAL NEWSPAPER THAT POSTS ALL LEGAL NOTICES AND PUBLIC NOTICES ON THE STATEWIDE PUBLIC NOTICE WEBSITE AT NO ADDITIONAL COST;(II) AN ONLINE-ONLY NEWSPAPER THAT POSTS ALL LEGAL NOTICES AND PUBLIC NOTICES ON THE STATEWIDE PUBLIC NOTICE WEBSITE AT NO ADDITIONAL COST; OR(III) A FREE NEWSPAPER THAT:(A) POSTS ALL LEGAL NOTICES AND PUBLIC NOTICES ON ITS WEBSITE AT NO ADDITIONAL COST; AND(B) POSTS ALL LEGAL NOTICES AND PUBLIC NOTICES ON THE STATEWIDE PUBLIC NOTICE WEBSITE AT NO ADDITIONAL COST."Newspaper website." An Internet website maintained and administered by a printed newspaper, digital newspaper, online-only newspaper or free newspaper on which the printed newspaper, digital newspaper, online-only newspaper or free newspaper posts news stories and items of public interest.["Nonpareil." A type 6 type points in depth or height.]"Notice." A formal printed announcement, transmitting intelligence, information, or warning, to a particular person, or generally to all persons who may read such notice."Official advertisement." A notice, advertisement, publication, or statement, or an abstract of a notice, 20250HB1291PN2880 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 advertisement, publication, or statement, required to be made by law, rule, order, or decree of court, by any person, or in the conduct of the business of a private or public corporation, or on the order of any government unit, or in the performance of any official duty imposed by law, rule, order, or decree of court, resolution or ordinance."Official advertising and legal advertising." Any advertisement, notice, statement, report, resolution, ordinance, or abstract of the same, required by law, rule, order or decree of court, by resolution of any board of directors, shareholders or officers of any corporation or unincorporated association, or any government unit to be printed and published for a valuable consideration in a newspaper."Official newspaper." A newspaper designated by a government unit for the publication of notices and statements required by rule, order, resolution, or ordinance of such unit."Online-only newspaper." A newspaper that:(1) is available to the general public exclusively online or digitally;(2) is a continuous publication and:(i) has been actively and continuously publishing for at least one year;(ii) contains content that must be updated daily; and(iii) is registered as a business with the Department of State of the Commonwealth;(3) is principally devoted to the dissemination of ORIGINAL local or general news and other editorial content that must constitute CONSTITUTES not less than 25% of overall content ON AN ANNUAL AVERAGE ; 20250HB1291PN2880 - 10 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) follows the ethics and standards of print journalism;(5) has its own registered domain name;(6) does not serve as a platform promoting the interests or opinions of a special interest group, individual or cause;(7) USES WRITTEN CONTENT AS ITS PRIMARY REPORTING METHOD AND MEANS OF COMMUNICATION;(8) EMPLOYS A LOCAL NEWS STAFF;(9) HAS A VERIFIABLE LOCAL AUDIENCE;(7) (10) is easily accessible to the public through common Internet search engines or other Internet search means;(8) (11) contains conspicuous links or a heading on its landing page that direct members of the public to legal notices and public notices; and(9) (12) is produced in an archivable format and content must be archived on a server or website."Ordinance." A municipal rule or regulation, adopted in the manner required by statute or home rule charter, by the lawfully constituted officers of any political subdivision or municipal or other local authority."Periodical." A printed paper or publication, issued in pamphlet or book form, regardless of page size or number of pages, at stated or regular intervals of more than one day between each issue, containing either general, class, trade, technical, scientific, serial articles, or other reading matter, advertising, et cetera, and entitled to be entered as second class matter in the United States mails under the Postal Rules and Regulations of the United States.["Pica." A type 12 type points in depth or height.20250HB1291PN2880 - 11 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Point." A unit of measurement for determining the height of a type, letter, figure, or other character, or the width of a rule, as heretofore generally known and fixed by general agreement of certain type founders and manufacturers, at 0.0138 inch in length.]"Printed newspaper." As follows:(1) A printed paper or publication that:(i) bears a title or name and conveys reading or pictorial intelligence of passing events, local or general happenings, including regular or sporadic editorial comment, announcements, miscellaneous reading matter, commercial advertising, classified advertising, legal advertising and other notices;(ii) is a continuous publication and:(A) is issued in numbers of four or more pages at short intervals, either daily, twice or more often each week or weekly; and(B) is published continuously during a period of at least six months, or as the successor of such a printed paper or publication issued during an immediately prior period of at least six months.(iii) is circulated and distributed from an established place of business to subscribers or readers without regard to number, for a definite price or consideration, either entered or entitled to be entered under the Postal Rules and Regulations as second class matter in the United States mail, and subscribed for by readers at a fixed price for each issue, or at a price fixed per annum; and(iv) may be a daily newspaper, weekly newspaper, 20250HB1291PN2880 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 newspaper of general circulation, official newspaper or a legal newspaper.(2) The term does not include:(i) a printed paper or publication, regardless of size, contents or time of issue, or number of copies issued, distributed and circulated gratuitously; and(ii) a printed paper or publication, not entitled to be entered, or which has been denied entry, as second class matter in the United States mail under the Postal Rules and Regulations of the United States."Proof of publication." A printed or written statement, declaring the name of a newspaper of general circulation, a legal newspaper or an official newspaper, as defined in this section, its place of business, when the same was established, the date or dates, and issue or issues, in which a [printed] legal notice, public notice or publication appeared[, and to which is securely attached,] exactly as [printed or] published, a copy of the official advertisement, official notice, legal notice, public notice or legal advertisement, verified with a statement of the owner, publisher, or the designated agent of the owner or publisher, of such publication in which the official or legal advertisement or notice was published, duly sworn to before a person authorized to administer oaths, and also declaring that the affiant is not interested in the subject matter of the notice or advertising, and that all of the allegations of the statement as to the time, place, and character of publication are true."Publication."[(1)] The act of printing or posting online a legal notice or public notice[, advertisement, or proclamation,] 20250HB1291PN2880 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the purpose of disseminating information to individuals or the [people] public at large.[(2) A journal, magazine, newspaper, class newspaper or periodical.]"Public notice." When required to be printed or published, an official advertisement."Rate." The price or sum fixed for [printing and] publishing [either official, legal, or commercial advertising, and may be either a price or sum fixed for a single reading line in a single column, or for a space of the depth of one inch in a single column, or it may mean the particular stated sums or prices fixed for printing and publishing official or legal advertising, where the style and form does not vary except for the names and addresses of the interested parties, such as notices of applications for charters of incorporation, shareholders' meetings, executors', administrators' or auditors' notices, register of wills' audit notices, obituary or death notices, et cetera.] legal notices or public notices.["Reading matter." News or other printed matter, intended to be read, as distinguished from intelligence notices, announcements, display advertising, or advertising published for a compensation.]"Resolution." A formal agreement or consent to do or not to do a certain thing, which has been recorded upon the minutes or records of a government unit, or by either the shareholders, board of directors or other body of a corporation, or by the members, directors, managers, or trustees of an unincorporated association or society of individuals."Rule." Any formal order or direction made by a tribunal or other government unit.20250HB1291PN2880 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ["Sample copy." A copy of a publication distributed without charge or expense to prospective subscribers or advertisers, in numbers limited by the United States Postal Rules and Regulations governing second class mail matter."Small pica." A type 11 type points in depth or height."Space." The length and breadth of a printed type page, or any subdivision thereof, intended to be used for either news or advertising matter of any kind.]"Statewide association representing print and digital news media organizations." A Pennsylvania nonprofit organization:(1) approved by the Internal Revenue Service as a section 501(c)(6) trade association representing the interests of print and digital news media organizations in this Commonwealth through advocacy, education and information sharing;(2) headquartered in Harrisburg;(3) which includes as members a majority of newspapers of general circulation serving this Commonwealth; and(4) that has been in existence continuously for at least 50 years."Statewide public notice website." A website:(1) maintained and administered by a Statewide association representing print and digital news media organizations;(2) on which all newspapers of general circulation in this Commonwealth post their legal notices and public notices;(3) that is available for viewing and searching by the public, free of charge; and(4) that accepts legal notices and public notice 20250HB1291PN2880 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 postings from any newspaper of general circulation in this Commonwealth."Subscriber." A person who buys or orders verbally or by written or online subscription[, or accepts upon delivery from the United States mails or a carrier, issues or copies of any publication].["Type." A piece of metal or wood from which either a letter, figure, or other character is impressed with ink upon paper, or an image of such a character.]"Weekly newspaper." A newspaper issued at least once a week.* * *CHAPTER 3LEGAL NOTICE AND PUBLIC NOTICE ADVERTISING§ 303. Level of advertising rates.(a) General rule.--All official and legal advertising shall be charged for at an established or declared rate [or price per single column, line of reading matter measured in depth by the point system, or at a rate or price per inch single column]. When such official and legal advertising is not classified and is not published according to prescribed or recognized forms, and no rate has been established or declared, such rate for official and legal advertising shall not be in excess of the rates usually charged or received by the publication publishing such official and legal advertising for commercial, general, or other advertising.[(b) Exception.--Where official and legal advertising is usually and ordinarily published according to recognized or prescribed forms, or particular matters are itemized and classified under general headings, subsection (a) shall not prohibit the fixing of definite prices or sums for publishing 20250HB1291PN2880 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 official and legal advertising, regardless of the number of single column lines or space required for each item, notice, or advertisement published in any separate matter or proceeding, and regardless of rates established, fixed, charged or received for commercial, general or other advertising. The purpose of this subsection is to enable newspapers to take into consideration, as elements, when fixing advertising rates or charges, location of the advertisement in the newspaper, the purpose to be served, the character of the advertising, and that a newspaper is entitled to compensation for its readiness at all times to render an advertising service.]§ 307. EFFECT OF FAILURE TO ADVERTISE WHEN REQUIRED.(A) GENERAL RULE.--NO LEGAL PROCEEDING, MATTER, OR CASE IN WHICH NOTICE IS REQUIRED TO BE GIVEN BY PUBLIC NOTICE, OFFICIAL OR LEGAL ADVERTISING, SHALL BE BINDING AND EFFECTIVE UPON ANY INTERESTED PERSON UNLESS SUCH PUBLIC NOTICE, OFFICIAL AND LEGAL ADVERTISING IS [PRINTED AND] PUBLISHED IN THE NEWSPAPERS OF GENERAL CIRCULATION, OFFICIAL NEWSPAPERS, AND LEGAL NEWSPAPERS DEFINED BY THIS TITLE, IN THE MANNER AND AS REQUIRED BY STATUTE, AND BY ANY RULE, ORDER, OR DECREE OF COURT, RESOLUTION OF A CORPORATION, OR UNINCORPORATED ASSOCIATION, OR ORDINANCE, RULE, OR REGULATION OF ANY GOVERNMENT UNIT, IN THE PROPER NEWSPAPERS OF GENERAL CIRCULATION, OFFICIAL NEWSPAPERS, AND LEGAL NEWSPAPERS, DEFINED BY THIS TITLE, AND A PROOF OF PUBLICATION IS FILED OF RECORD IN SUCH MATTER OR PROCEEDING.(B) PUBLIC NOTICE PUBLISHED IN PRINTED NEWSPAPERS.--(1) PUBLIC NOTICE THAT IS PUBLISHED BY A PRINTED NEWSPAPER THAT QUALIFIES AS A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION ON ITS INTERNET WEBSITE AND ON THE STATEWIDE PUBLIC NOTICE WEBSITE SHALL BE BINDING AND EFFECTIVE IF 20250HB1291PN2880 - 17 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NOTICE IS REQUIRED BY LAW WITHIN A TIME FRAME THAT DOES NOT PERMIT A PRINTED PUBLIC NOTICE BY THE SAME PRINTED NEWSPAPER.(2) A PUBLIC NOTICE PUBLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL BE PUBLISHED IN THE NEXT REGULARLY SCHEDULED PRINT EDITION FOLLOWING PUBLICATION ON THE PRINTED NEWSPAPER'S INTERNET WEBSITE AND THE STATEWIDE PUBLIC NOTICE WEBSITE.§ 310. No unauthorized advertisements to be published.No advertisement shall be published by any court or other government unit, which is not duly authorized by law[, nor in more papers than so authorized].Section 2. Title 45 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 311. Publication in newspapers of general circulation.(a) Limitation.--Legal notices and public notices may only be published in newspapers of general circulation.(A) LIMITATION.--(1) LEGAL NOTICES AND PUBLIC NOTICES MAY ONLY BE PUBLISHED IN NEWSPAPERS OF GENERAL CIRCULATION.(2) PARAGRAPH (1) DOES NOT APPLY TO A LEGAL NOTICE OR PUBLIC NOTICE REQUIRED BY OTHER LAW TO BE PUBLISHED IN A LEGAL NEWSPAPER.(b) Website operator duties.--When publishing a legal notice or public notice on a newspaper's website, on the Statewide public notice website or in a digital newspaper or in an online-only newspaper, the operator of the website shall:(1) ensure access to the website at all times, other than during website maintenance or due to causes beyond the operator's control;(2) make the full text of the legal notice or public notice available in a searchable format for the period of 20250HB1291PN2880 - 18 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 time that the legal notice or public notice is required to be posted;(3) provide access to view legal notices or public notices on the website LANDING PAGE CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY and perform searches for legal notices or public notices on the website, for no fee, provided that the operator may charge a fee for enhanced search and customized content delivery features;(4) maintain an archive of legal notices or public notices that are no longer displayed on the website for at least one year from the date of publication; and(5) charge no additional fee for a publication on the Statewide public notice website and a printed newspaper and free newspaper may not charge an additional fee for publication of printed legal notices or public notices on their websites.(C) DUTY OF GOVERNMENT UNITS.--(1) THE FOLLOWING GOVERNMENT UNITS SHALL ADOPT A RESOLUTION DECLARING WHICH NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION SHALL BE USED TO CARRY THE GOVERNMENT UNIT'S LEGAL NOTICES AND PUBLIC NOTICES:(I) POLITICAL SUBDIVISION;(II) INTERMEDIATE UNIT;(III) CHARTER SCHOOL;(IV) CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL;(V) PUBLIC TRADE SCHOOL;(VI) AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL;(VII) LOCAL AGENCY, AUTHORITY, COUNCIL, BOARD AND COMMISSION;(VIII) INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGENCY, AUTHORITY, COUNCIL, 20250HB1291PN2880 - 19 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BOARD AND COMMISSION;(IX) REGIONAL AGENCY, AUTHORITY, COUNCIL, BOARD AND COMMISSION;(X) MUNICIPAL AGENCY, AUTHORITY, COUNCIL, BOARD AND COMMISSION; AND(XI) SIMILAR GOVERNMENT ENTITY.(2) THE RESOLUTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL BE ADOPTED AT A PUBLIC MEETING THAT ADHERES TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF 65 PA.C.S. CH. 7 (RELATING TO OPEN MEETINGS).SECTION 3. TITLE 45 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 312. CONSTRUCTION.NOTHING IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO SUPERSEDE, ALTER OR ELIMINATE ANY REQUIREMENT TO PUBLISH A LEGAL OR PUBLIC NOTICE IN A LEGAL NEWSPAPER AS REQUIRED BY ANY OTHER LAW, RULE, ORDER OR DECREE OF COURT.Section 3 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1291PN2880 - 20 - <--12345678910111213141516